Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-103
State Library; directors; powers.

The judges of the Supreme Court shall constitute a board of directors of the State Library. They shall have power to make such rules as they may deem proper, not inconsistent with sections 51-101 to 51-109, for the regulation of the library under their direction, and may prescribe penalties for any violation thereof, which shall be collected in the same manner as for the nonreturn or injury of any books.

Laws 1871, §§ 3, 4, p. 52;

R.S.1913, § 3779;

C.S.1922, § 3172;

C.S.1929, § 51-103;

R.S.1943, § 51-103.